Utah statutes.
53-11-105.   Powers and duties of board.

(1)  The board shall:

(a)  review all applications for licensing and renewals of licenses under this chapter and approve or disapprove all applications;

(b)  review all complaints and take disciplinary action; and

(c)  establish standards for and approve providers of courses required for licensure under this section.

(2)  The board may take and hear evidence, administer oaths and affirmations, and compel by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, papers, records, documents, and other information relating to:

(a)  investigation of an applicant for licensure under this chapter; or

(b)  a formal complaint against or department investigation of a bail enforcement agent, bail recovery agent, or bail recovery apprentice.



Enacted by Chapter 257, 1998 General Session

